Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 12. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.06.905.
Voting of shares; quorum; status of disqualified shares.

If the articles of incorporation provide for more or less than one vote for a share on a matter, a reference in this chapter to a majority or other proportion of shares means a majority or other proportion of the votes entitled to be cast on that matter. If shares are disqualified from voting on a matter, they may not be considered outstanding for the determination of a quorum at a meeting to act upon or for the required vote to approve action upon that matter.

A requirement in this chapter for a vote of each class of outstanding shares means a vote regardless of limitations or restrictions upon the voting rights of that class, unless expressly limited to voting shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.910.
Processing of writings delivered to the commissioner.

If a writing delivered to the commissioner for filing conforms to law and all fees and corporation taxes prescribed in this chapter have been paid, the commissioner shall

endorse on each original and an exact copy the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

file the exact copy in the commissioner’s office;

return the original of the writing, together with any writing issued by the commissioner attached to the original, to the corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.915.
Disapproval of writing by commissioner; appeal.

If the commissioner fails to approve articles of incorporation, amendment, merger, consolidation, exchange, or dissolution, or any other document required by this chapter to be approved by the commissioner, the commissioner shall, within 10 days after the delivery of the document to the commissioner, give written notice of disapproval to the person or domestic or foreign corporation, delivering the document, and specifying the reasons for disapproval. The person or corporation may appeal from the disapproval to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a notice of appeal setting out a copy of the document sought to be filed and a copy of the written disapproval. The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, which shall either sustain the action of the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 10, see sec. 33, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure 204 and 609, see secs. 34 and 35, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.920.
Correction of filed writings.

A writing relating to a corporation filed by the commissioner under this chapter may be corrected if it contains an error apparent on the face or defect in the execution of the writing, including the deletion of a matter not permitted to be stated in the writing. A certificate, entitled “Certificate of Correction of . . . (correct title of writing and name of corporation)”, shall be signed in the same manner as the original writing and shall be delivered to the commissioner. The certificate must set out the name of the corporation, the date the writing to be corrected was filed by the commissioner, the provision in the writing corrected or eliminated, and, if the execution was defective, the proper execution. The filing of the certificate by the commissioner does not alter the effective time of the writing being corrected and does not affect any right or liability accrued or incurred before the filing. A corporate name may not be changed or corrected under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.925.
Writings and absence of filings as evidence.

A writing filed by the commissioner relating to a corporation and containing statements of fact required or permitted by law and a certification by the commissioner of the absence of a filing shall be received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as prima facie evidence of these facts and of the execution of the writing.

If under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state a writing by an officer in that jurisdiction or a copy of a writing certified or exemplified by the officer may be received as prima facie evidence of the incorporation, existence, or capacity of any foreign corporation incorporated in that jurisdiction, the writing when exemplified shall be received by all courts, public offices, and official bodies of this state as prima facie evidence with the same force as in another jurisdiction. The writing or certified copy of the writing shall be received without being exemplified if it is certified by the secretary of state or official performing the equivalent function as to corporate records of that jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Evidence 803(8), see sec. 36, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.930.
Corporate seal as evidence.

The presence of a corporate seal on a writing purporting to be executed by authority of a corporation shall be prima facie evidence that the writing was executed with the authority of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.935.
Waiver of notice.

If notice is required to be given to a shareholder or director of a corporation under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of the articles or bylaws of the corporation, a waiver of the notice in writing signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated for notice, is equivalent to the giving of notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)